Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2771.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 31-418, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE31-418. Community supervision fee; deposit; community corrections enhancement fund; drug testing costs; rehabilitation costs A. During the period of time that the prisoner remains on community supervision, the state department of corrections shall require as a condition of community supervision that the prisoner pay a monthly supervision fee of at least sixty-five dollars $65 unless, after determining the inability of the prisoner to pay the fee, the department requires payment of a lesser amount. The supervising community supervision officer shall monitor the collection of the fee. B. Seventy per cent percent of the monies collected pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the victim compensation and assistance fund established by section 41-2407 and thirty per cent percent shall be deposited in the community corrections enhancement fund established by this section. C. The community corrections enhancement fund is established consisting of monies received pursuant to subsection B of this section, sections 31-411, 31-467.06 and 41-1604.08 and section 41-1604.13, subsection D, paragraph 8.  The department shall administer the fund and use fund monies to pay for costs related to community corrections. D. In addition to any other fees, the department may require as a condition of community supervision that the prisoner pay the reasonable costs associated with the prisoner's participation in a drug testing program or a rehabilitation program. The prisoner's costs shall not exceed the department's cost for the program.  The monies collected pursuant to this subsection by the department may only be used to offset the costs of the drug testing program or the rehabilitation program. END_STATUTE